Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3523
Care and services;
action for recovery.

Any
suit to recover any costs and fees for the care and services as described in section 23-3522 shall be brought
(1) in the name of the board of trustees of the facility established under section
23-3501 or (2) in the case of a hospital maintained and operated
by a hospital district, in the name of the hospital district.

Laws 1971, LB 908, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.71;

Laws 2012, LB995, § 9.